North Carolina, session 2025, SB642.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 25B of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-376.7. Evidence-based mental health training.
(a) This section may be referred to as the Suicide, Safety, and Violence Education
(SAVE) Students Act.
(b) As used in this section, "evidence-based" means a program or practice that does either
of the following:
(1) Demonstrates a rationale based on high-quality research findings or positive
evaluation that such a program or practice is likely to improve relevant
outcomes and includes ongoing efforts to examine the effects of the program
or practice.
(2) Has a statistically significant effect on relevant outcomes based on at least one
of the following:
a. Strong evidence from at least one well-designed and
well-implemented experimental study.
b. Moderate evidence from at least one well-designed and
well-implemented quasi-experimental study.
c. Promising evidence from at least one well-designed and
well-implemented correlation study with statistical controls for
selection bias.
(c) The Department of Public Instruction, in consultation with the Department of Health
and Human Services, shall maintain a list of approved evidence-based training programs,
including at least one option that is free or of no cost to a school, to be posted on the Department
of Public Instruction's web site, for the following topics:
(1) Suicide awareness and prevention and violence prevention. To qualify as a
training program for this topic, the training course shall include all of the
following:
a. How to instruct school personnel to identify the signs and symptoms
of depression, suicide, and self-harm in students.
b. How to instruct student to identify the signs and symptoms of
depression, suicide, and self-harm in their peers.
*S642-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. How to identify appropriate mental health services within schools and
within larger communities, and when and how to refer youth and their
families to those services.
d. How to teach students about mental health and depression, warning
signs of suicide, and the importance of and processes for seeking help
on behalf of self and peers and reporting of these behaviors.
e. How to identify observable warning signs and signals of individuals
who may be a threat to themselves or others.
f. The importance of taking threats seriously and seeking help.
g. How students can report dangerous, violent, threatening, harmful, or
potentially harmful activity, including the use of the anonymous tip
line.
(2) Social inclusion. To qualify as a training program for this topic, the training
course shall include the following:
a. What social isolation is and how to identify it in others.
b. What social inclusion is and the importance of establishing
connections with peers.
c. When and how to seek help for peers who may be socially isolated.
d. How to utilize strategies for more social inclusion in classrooms and
the school community.
(d) All public school students in grades 6 through 12 shall receive two hours or two
standard class periods, whichever is shorter, of training per school year from a program approved
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. One hour shall be training and instruction on suicide
awareness and prevention and violence prevention and the other hour shall be training and
instruction on social inclusion. Each hour of training is not required to be conducted
consecutively.
(e) Schools may use student assemblies, classroom instruction, digital learning,
homework, or any combination thereof to provide students the training required by this section.
(f) Upon written request of a student's parent or legal guardian, a student shall be excused
from any training required under this section.
(g) All public school employees who have significant interaction with students as part of
their routine duties shall receive one hour of training per school year from a program approved
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section on suicide awareness and prevention and violence
prevent.
(h) Training provided to students pursuant to this section may be credited toward any
health education requirements under G.S. 115C-81.25 and any training provided to teachers
pursuant to this section may be credited toward the training hour requirement under
G.S. 115C-376.5.
(i) The governing body of a public school unit shall allow the creation of a student-led
club focused on suicide prevention, student safety, and violence and social isolation prevention
for each school within the public school unit that has student in grades 6 through 12. Each club
shall:
(1) Be open to all students in grade 6 through 12.
(2) Have at least one school employee serve as an advisor.
(3) Develop and maintain awareness of activities related to suicide prevention or
student safety and violence and social isolation prevention training.
(4) Foster opportunities for student leadership development."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) School-based mental health plan required. – A local board of education shall
adopt a school-based mental health plan, including a mental health training
Page 2 Senate Bill 642-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
program and suicide risk referral protocol, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-376.5 and G.S. 115C-376.7."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C(16) reads as rewritten:
"(16) School-based mental health plan required. – A regional school shall adopt a
school-based mental health plan, including a mental health training program
and suicide risk referral protocol, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-376.5.115C-376.5 and G.S. 115C-376.7."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(h) A charter school shall adopt a school-based mental health plan, including a mental
health training program and suicide risk referral protocol, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-376.5.115C-376.5 and G.S. 115C-376.7."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(16) School-based mental health plan required. – A regional school shall adopt a
school-based mental health plan, including a mental health training program
and suicide risk referral protocol, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-376.5.115C-376.5 and G.S. 115C-376.7."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(18) School-based mental health plan required. – A laboratory school shall adopt a
school-based mental health plan, including a mental health training program
and suicide risk referral protocol, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-376.5.115C-376.5 and G.S. 115C-376.7."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Senate Bill 642-First Edition Page 3